Indiana, session 2026, SB148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-8-25.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.16-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this
chapter:
(1) "Executive board" means the task force executive board
established by section 3 of this chapter.
(2) "Task force" means the Indiana crime guns task force
established by section 2 of this chapter.
(3) "Task force area" means one (1) or more of the following
counties:
(A) Boone County.
(B) Hamilton County.
(C) Hancock County.
(D) Hendricks County.
(E) Marion County.
(F) Morgan County.
(G) Johnson County.
(H) Shelby County.
(I) Allen County.
(J) Lake County.
(K) LaPorte County.
(L) Porter County.
SEA 148

2
SECTION 2. IC 36-8-25.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.16-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3. (a) The task force executive board is
established to oversee and direct the operations of the task force.
(b) The executive board consists of:
(1) the chief of police of the Indianapolis metropolitan police
department or the chief's designee, who serves as the chairperson
of the executive board;
(2) the superintendent of the Indiana state police department or
the superintendent's designee, who serves as the vice chairperson
of the executive board; and
(3) a sheriff or chief of police from each department in the task
force area which has assigned an officer to the task force.
(c) The executive board shall hold meetings at the call of the
chairperson. The executive board may establish rules governing
meetings.
(d) Seven (7) A majority of the executive board members
constitute from agencies actively participating constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of business. Each member has one (1) vote, and
action by the executive board may be taken only upon the affirmative
votes of the majority of attending members. If a vote is a tie, the
position for which the chairperson voted prevails, as long as that
position has received the affirmative votes of at least four (4) members.
(e) A member of the executive board is not entitled to:
(1) the minimum salary per diem provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1(b);
or
(2) reimbursement for traveling and other expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4.
SEA 148

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 148